Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5169.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 4mm. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the sale of tangible
personal property to either of the following is exempt from the tax
under this act:
(a) A person for assembly, use, or consumption in connection
with a large agricultural processing facility project.
(b) A person engaged in the business of constructing,
altering, repairing, or improving real estate for others in
connection with a large agricultural processing facility project.
(2) Tangible personal property described in subsection (1) is
ERE H04966'25 (H-2) rp1wy7


exempt from the tax under this act only to the extent the tangible
personal property is to be affixed to and made a structural part
of, or otherwise made to be an integral part of, the agricultural
processing facility to which the project relates or infrastructure
improvements for the agricultural processing facility to which the
project relates.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural processing facility" means a facility
located in this state that transforms, packages, sorts, or grades
livestock or livestock products, agricultural commodities, or
plants or plant products, excluding forest products, into goods
that are used for intermediate or final consumption, including
goods for nonfood use.
(b) "Large agricultural processing facility project" or
"project" means a project that meets both of the following
requirements:
(i) The project is for 1 or more of the following purposes:
(A) Construction or expansion of an agricultural processing
facility.
(B) Infrastructure improvements for an agricultural processing
facility.
(C) Retooling of an agricultural processing facility.
(ii) The capital investment in the project is not less than
$50,000,000.00.
Final Page
ERE H04966'25 (H-2) rp1wy7